Alabama, session 2026rs, SB373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) This section shall apply to all general
and special elections other than municipal elections.
(b) Beginning in the election cycle for the November
2028 General Election, qualified electors of this state may
obtain and cast an in-person ballot in advance of election
day, without excuse, at an early voting center in accordance
with this section.
(c)(1) The early voting period shall begin the Saturday
10 calendar days before election day and extend until close of
business on the Thursday five days before election day. Early
voting centers shall have the following hours of operation:
a. On weekdays and Saturdays, early voting centers
shall be open 9:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m.
b. On Sundays, early voting centers shall be open 1:00
p.m. to 5:00 p.m.
(2) The early voting election officials may establish
Page 2

(2) The early voting election officials may establish
SB373 INTRODUCED
hours of operation where the early voting centers are open
longer than the required times under subdivision (1). Nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a county
commission from establishing a greater number of hours for
voting during the early voting period beyond the number of
hours required by this subsection.
(d)(1) Notwithstanding Section 17-8-1, Code of Alabama
1975, not more than 20 nor less than 15 days before the date
early voting begins pursuant to this section, the appointing
board of each county shall appoint necessary early voting
election officials, including at least one inspector and three
clerks at each center. During the early voting period,
election officials shall carry out the roles, duties, and
functions prescribed by law to election officials on election
day, as further provided by rules adopted by the Secretary of
State. Election officials shall be compensated for their
services as provided in Section 17-8-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) Poll watchers shall be allowed at each early voting
center as provided in Section 17-8-7, Code of Alabama 1975, or
as otherwise provided by law.
(e)(1) Each county shall operate at least one early
voting center for every 100,000 residents, according to the
most recent federal decennial census. The county commission
shall determine the location of each early voting center and
the geographical area the center serves using the most recent
federal decennial census tract and block map. The boundaries
shall coincide with existing precinct boundaries. An early
voting center may be located in any branch of the county
Page 3

voting center may be located in any branch of the county
SB373 INTRODUCED
courthouse or courthouse annex, a government building
generally accessible to the public, or a location that is used
as an election day polling place.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1), for any special
election, the county commission, by majority vote, may reduce
the number of early voting centers when the commission
determines a lesser number of centers is sufficient to meet
the needs of early voters.
(f) The process for voting at an early voting center
shall be conducted in the same manner as set forth in state
law for voting in person on election day. Each early voting
center shall be equipped with at least two tabulator machines
with which electors may cast their paper ballot. When the time
arrives for closing the early voting centers each day, all
qualified voters who are waiting in line to vote shall be
100 permitted by the election officer to cast their vote. Upon the
101 daily closing of an early voting center, the election officers
102 shall secure all ballots cast, the poll lists maintained at
103 the location, and all other voting materials, whether used or
104 unused, as provided by rules adopted by the Secretary of State
105 as necessary to comply with state law.
106 (g) Each county commission shall create a communication
107 plan to inform eligible electors of the opportunity to vote
108 early. The plan may use any media outlet, including social
109 media and the official county website, and shall publicize the
110 designation of voting precincts to assigned early voting
111 centers, along with the location, date, and hours of operation
112 of each early voting center. Each county shall provide the
Page 4

of each early voting center. Each county shall provide the
SB373 INTRODUCED
113 Secretary of State's Office with elector polling place
114 information for early voting, and the Secretary of State shall
115 integrate the early voting polling place information in its
116 voter information poll locator website.
117 (h) All expenses and costs incurred to comply with this
118 section shall be reimbursed in accordance with Article 1 of
119 Chapter 16 of Title 17, Code of Alabama 1975.
120 (i) The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to
121 implement this section. The rules shall include, but not be
122 limited to, provisions that do all of the following:
123 (1) Ensure that ballots cast early, by any method
124 allowed under state law, are counted and canvassed as if cast
125 on election day.
126 (2) Ensure an efficient and fair early voting process
127 that respects the privacy of the voter.
128 (3) Ensure that electors who vote during the early
129 voting period are not permitted to vote more than once in the
130 same election.
131 Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
132 2026.
Page 5